apertium-ckb/apertium-ckb.ckb.lexc
LEXICON NPs

kwrdstan:kwrdstan NP_pakstan ;
pakstan:pakstan NP_pakstan ;
yêran:yêran NP_pakstan ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
